Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5199.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin HENNEPIN HEALTHCARE FUTURE STRUCTURE AND GOVERNANCE ADVISORY TASK FORCE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment; purpose. new text end new text begin The Hennepin Healthcare Future Structure and Governance Advisory Task Force is established to develop recommendations to the legislature regarding the future ownership, governance, and financing structure of Hennepin Healthcare System, Inc. (Hennepin Healthcare), including its integrated system of health care facilities and services that includes Hennepin County Medical Center (HCMC). The advisory task force must evaluate options that recognize HCMC as a regional and statewide public health and public safety asset that: (1) provides critical health care services, including Level I trauma care, hyperbaric medicine, treatment services for burns and complex wounds, comprehensive cancer care, and accredited poison control services; and (2) supports education and training of health care professionals in Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Leadership; composition. new text end new text begin (a) The advisory task force must consist of 14 members appointed by the governor. Members must include: new text end new text begin (1) one member with expertise in health care sector leadership and state public health systems; new text end new text begin (2) three members with professional experience in hospital and clinical system operations, specifically those providing safety net care; new text end new text begin (3) three members with professional experience in health care finance and public health insurance programs; new text end new text begin (4) two members with professional experience in public sector governance and public authorities; new text end new text begin (5) three members representing the health care sector workforce; and new text end new text begin (6) two members representing patient and community perspectives, particularly communities disproportionately impacted by lack of access to health care. new text end new text begin (b) The governor must make appointments by August 1, 2026. new text end new text begin (c) Members appointed under this subdivision serve until the advisory task force expires. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Organization and meetings. new text end new text begin (a) The member appointed under subdivision 2, clause (1), must serve as chair of the advisory task force. The chair must convene the first meeting of the advisory task force by September 1, 2026. The advisory task force must meet at least once per month and more frequently at the call of the chair. new text end new text begin (b) Members of the advisory task force receive no compensation for their services but must be reimbursed as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 15.059, for expenses incurred as a result of their duties as members of the advisory task force. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Duties and powers. new text end new text begin (a) The advisory task force must: new text end new text begin (1) evaluate the current governance structure of Hennepin Healthcare; new text end new text begin (2) evaluate governance and ownership models at hospital systems comparable to Hennepin Healthcare; new text end new text begin (3) evaluate financing and funding mechanisms to achieve sustainable, long-term funding of Hennepin Healthcare; new text end new text begin (4) engage public health stakeholders throughout the state, including but not limited to cities, counties, health systems, labor organizations, patient and community representatives, state agencies, and experts in public finance and governance; and new text end new text begin (5) develop specific recommendations for structures of ownership, governance, and sustainable, long-term funding of Hennepin Healthcare, as well as strategies for any ownership or governance transitions and a timeline to implement such transitions. new text end new text begin (b) In conducting evaluations under paragraph (a), the advisory task force must consider a full range of potential ownership, governance, and structural models, including models that may involve regional, multicounty, state, or public authority ownership structures. Such evaluations are not limited to the ownership of Hennepin Healthcare by Hennepin County. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Administrative support. new text end new text begin The commissioner of health must provide meeting space and administrative services for the advisory task force. State agencies must provide technical assistance upon the request of the advisory task force. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin By February 15, 2027, the advisory task force must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over health and human services, taxation, and state government. The report must, at a minimum, include the following: new text end new text begin (1) specific recommendations for structures of ownership, governance, and sustainable, long-term funding of Hennepin Healthcare; a fiscal analysis of all recommendations; and a timeline to implement all recommendations; and new text end new text begin (2) draft legislation necessary to implement the specific recommendations. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The advisory task force expires June 30, 2027, or upon submission of the required report, whichever is later. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; HENNEPIN HEALTHCARE FUTURE STRUCTURE AND GOVERNANCE ADVISORY TASK FORCE.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for the Hennepin Healthcare Future Structure and Governance Advisory Task Force. new text end